Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3228.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 481.2 of Title 59, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. The State Board of Medical Licensure and Supervision shall
establish and maintain a comprehensive public database of medical
malpractice lawsuits filed against licensed physicians in this
state. The database shall:
1. Be user-friendly;
2. Be accessible to the public through the Board's official
website;
Req. No. 15569 Page 1

3. Be regularly updated; and
4. Comply with all applicable privacy laws concerning sensitive
patient information.
B. The database shall include:
1. The name of the physician;
2. The nature of the medical malpractice claim;
3. The date the lawsuit was filed;
4. The disposition of the case;
5. Any disciplinary action taken by the Board as a result of
the lawsuit; and
6. Internet links to relevant court documents when available.
C. All licensed physicians shall report to the Board any
medical malpractice lawsuit filed against him or her within thirty
(30) days of becoming aware of the lawsuit.
D. The Board shall implement an education campaign to inform
healthcare facilities, physicians, and the public about the database
and the purpose of the database including, but not limited to, how
it can be used to make informed healthcare decisions.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2027.

60-2-15569 AQH 12/12/25



Req. No. 15569 Page 2